Arkansas, session 2025, SB630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-103 is amended to read as follows:
5-4-103. Sentencing — Role of jury and court.
(a) If Except in a case in which a defendant is charged with capital
murder, § 5-10-101, if a defendant is charged with a felony or misdemeanor
and is found guilty of an offense by a jury, the jury court shall fix
punishment in a separate proceeding as authorized by this chapter according
to § 16-97-101 et seq.
(b) Except as provided by §§ 5-4-601 — 5-4-605, § 5-4-607, and § 5-4-
608, the court shall fix punishment as authorized by this chapter in any case
in which:
*CEB312*
04/04/2025 4:50:47 PM CEB312

SB630
(1) The defendant pleads guilty to an offense;
(2) The defendant's guilt is tried by the court;
(3) The jury fails to agree on punishment defendant's guilt is
tried by a jury;
(4) The prosecution and the defense agree that the court may fix
punishment; or
(5) A jury sentence is found by the trial court or an appellate
court to be in excess of the punishment authorized by law.
(c) It is the intent of this section to require sentencing in non-
capital criminal cases be conducted by the court and not by a jury because of
the:
(1) Technical nature of sentencing;
(2) Public interest in consistent and predictable sentencing for
similar offenses;
(3) Cost of incarceration; and
(4) Opportunity to address sentencing in a coordinated fashion,
which is available when sentencing is conducted by trained judicial officers.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-97-101 is amended to read as follows:
16-97-101. Bifurcated sentencing procedures.
The following procedure shall govern jury trials, which include any
felony or misdemeanor charges, except in a case in which the defendant is
charged with capital murder, § 5-10-101:
(1) The jury shall first hear all evidence relevant to every
charge on which a defendant is being tried and shall retire to reach a
verdict on each charge;
(2)(A) If the defendant is found guilty of one (1) or more
charges, the jury shall then hear additional evidence relevant to sentencing
on those charges. Evidence introduced in the guilt phase may be considered,
but need not be reintroduced at the sentencing phase Following the conclusion
of the jury finding of the defendant's guilt or innocence, the court shall
discharge the jury and order an applicable conviction.
(B) The court shall then sentence the defendant for a
charge that results in a conviction.
(C) In order to sentence the defendant, the court may:
(i) Consider evidence admitted at the first stage of
04/04/2025 4:50:47 PM CEB312

SB630
the trial; and
(ii) Conduct additional proceedings that are
necessary or beneficial in determining an appropriate sentence or other
judicial response to the conviction entered by the court;
(3) Following the introduction of additional evidence relevant
to sentencing, if any, instruction on the law, and argument, the jury shall
again retire and determine a sentence within the statutory range;
(4) The court, in its discretion, may also instruct the jury
that counsel may argue as to alternative sentences for which the defendant
may qualify. The jury, in its discretion, may make a recommendation as to an
alternative sentence. However, this recommendation shall not be binding on
the court;
(5) After a jury finds guilt, the defendant, with the agreement
of the prosecution and the consent of the court, may waive jury sentencing,
in which case the court shall impose sentence; and
(6) After a plea of guilty, the defendant, with the agreement of
the prosecution and the consent of the court, may shall be sentenced by a
jury impaneled for purposes of sentencing only the court.
(4) It is the intent of this section to require sentencing in
noncapital criminal cases be conducted by the court and not by a jury because
of the:
(A) Technical nature of sentencing;
(B) Public interest in consistent and predictable
sentencing for similar offenses;
(C) Cost of incarceration; and
(D) Opportunity to address sentencing in a coordinated
fashion, which is available when sentencing is conducted by trained judicial
officers.








04/04/2025 4:50:47 PM CEB312